Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.410

Wharves—City may let wharves or privileges thereon.

Every city of the first class may let the whole or any part of a wharf, or the privileges thereon owned by the city, for periods not to exceed one year in such manner, and upon such terms, as may be prescribed by a general ordinance.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.410. Prior: 1911 c 67 s 1; RRS s 8967.]